Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 201577-1404
Contributions.

Any person may make contributions to an account to meet the qualified disability expenses of the designated beneficiary of the account if the account and contributions meet the other requirements of sections 77-1403 to 77-1409 and the rules and regulations adopted and promulgated by the State Treasurer.

Laws 2015, LB591, § 4.
May 28, 2015